Indiana, session 2026, HB1017.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 21-27-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 11. Notification of Medical Emergency Contact
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "medical emergency" means an
incident concerning a student's health that results in the
notification and deployment of emergency services.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "student" means a student who
is:
(1) at least eighteen (18) years of age; and
(2) enrolled in a postsecondary educational institution in
Indiana or a state educational institution as a full-time
student.
Sec. 3. (a) Subject to subsection (b), each postsecondary
educational institution in Indiana and state educational institution
shall do the following:
(1) Establish and implement a procedure whereby a student
2026 IN 1017—LS 6215/DI 152


may designate a medical emergency contact for the institution
to notify if the:
(A) student experiences a medical emergency on the
institution's campus; and
(B) institution has knowledge of the medical emergency
described in clause (A).
(2) Not later than twenty-four (24) hours after a student
experiences a medical emergency on campus, notify the
student's medical emergency contact in accordance with the
procedure established under subdivision (1).
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a
postsecondary educational institution in Indiana or a state
educational institution to notify a student's medical emergency
contact designated under subsection (a) of the following medical
emergencies:
(1) A medical emergency that does not occur on the
institution's campus.
(2) A medical emergency of which the institution does not
have knowledge.
2026 IN 1017—LS 6215/DI 152